Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 2

Juvenile Court Restructure Act of 1982

37-1-201. Short title — Legislative intent.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Court Restructure Act of 1982.”

It is the purpose of this part to provide in every county of this state adequate juvenile court services as contemplated in the laws of Tennessee, as stated in this title and other general laws of the state of Tennessee now in force and effect, or hereafter to become of force and effect.

Acts 1982, ch. 934, § 1; T.C.A., § 37-261.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 8.2.

Law Reviews.

“The Politics of Protecting Children”: Keynote Address Revisiting Luzerne County: Promoting Fairness, Transparency and Accountability In Juvenile Court (Robert Schwartz), 7 Tenn. J. L. & Pol'y 263 (2011).

“The Politics of Protecting Children”: Panel Discussion 2: Litigation For Change (Jacqueline Dixon, Professor Dean Rivkin and Robert Schwartz), 7 Tenn. J. L. & Pol'y 218 (2011).

“The Politics of Protecting Children”: Panel Discussion 3: Confronting Political and Economic Challenges (Representative Sherry Jones, Connie Steere and Mary Walker), 7 Tenn. J. L. & Pol'y 289 (2011).

“The Politics of Protecting Children”: Panel Discussion 4: Best Practices In Representing Children in Court (The Honorable Timothy Irwin, Carlton Lewis and Dwight Stokes), 7 Tenn. J. L. & Pol'y 324 (2011).

37-1-202. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“District juvenile court” means a special juvenile court with jurisdiction in more than one (1) county; and

“Special juvenile court” means a court created by law with jurisdiction limited to those matters contemplated in this title and other general laws of this state.

Acts 1982, ch. 934, § 2; T.C.A., § 37-262.

37-1-203. Jurisdiction of general sessions court.

The general sessions courts shall exercise juvenile court jurisdiction in all of the counties of this state, except in the counties or municipalities in which juvenile courts are, or may hereafter be, specially provided by law; provided, that only general sessions court judges who are attorneys may order commitment of a delinquent child to the department of children's services.

Acts 1982, ch. 934, § 3; T.C.A., § 37-263; Acts 1989, ch. 278, § 37; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 73, 108.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of provision for designation of juvenile court clerk, OAG 99-027 (2/16/99).

Authority over the juvenile court system and its employees, OAG 07-004 (1/11/07).

Under T.C.A. §§37-1-203 and37-1-210(a), because the a county general sessions court also exercises juvenile court jurisdiction, the law requires that the general sessions court clerk shall serve as the juvenile court clerk, OAG 07-097 (7/3/07).

37-1-204. Procedure in general sessions court.

Any general sessions court exercising juvenile court jurisdiction shall, when exercising such jurisdiction, have the title and style of juvenile court of county, and shall maintain a separate juvenile court docket and minutes, and hearings pursuant to this title shall be separate from general sessions court proceedings.

Acts 1982, ch. 934, § 4; T.C.A., § 37-264.

37-1-205. Special district juvenile courts.

Special juvenile courts may be created by law to exercise juvenile court jurisdiction in a county or in several contiguous counties. Funds for the operation of such special district juvenile courts shall be furnished by the counties within each special juvenile court district. Counties within the juvenile court district shall, by contract, enter into such agreements as they may deem necessary and desirable in order to provide for the conducting of business affairs and financing of the court as provided in §5-1-114.

Acts 1982, ch. 934, § 5; T.C.A., § 37-265.

37-1-206. Magistrates — Court personnel — Signs.

Judges of juvenile courts shall appoint magistrates where constitutionally required and such other court personnel as may be necessary to assure availability of juvenile court services in every county of this state. Every court having juvenile jurisdiction shall have a sign in a conspicuous place identifying it as the “Juvenile Court.”

Acts 1982, ch. 934, § 6; T.C.A., § 37-266; Acts 2009, ch. 235, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 235, § 1 directed the code commission to revise appropriate references from “child support referees” and “juvenile referees” to “child support magistrates” and “juvenile magistrates” in the code as supplements are published and volumes are replaced.

37-1-207. Special juvenile courts — Judges.

Any special juvenile court created by law shall have such title and style as the act creating such court may provide. Each juvenile court shall be a court of record, presided over by a judge who shall have such qualifications and salary as may be provided by law. Upon creation of a special juvenile court, a judge of the court shall be appointed as provided by law until the next general election and a person duly qualified is elected, and until a successor qualifies. The term of office shall be the same as other judges of the state. In the event the office of judge of the juvenile court becomes vacant by reason of death, resignation, retirement or other cause, before the expiration of the term of the judge, the vacancy shall be filled as provided by law.

Acts 1982, ch. 934, § 7; T.C.A., § 37-267.

37-1-208. Contracts between counties.

Unless otherwise provided by law, the counties within a special juvenile court district may enter into contracts of agreement providing such terms and conditions therein as the parties deem best for the joint financial support, operation and maintenance of such special juvenile courts.

Acts 1982, ch. 934, § 8; T.C.A., § 37-268.

37-1-209. Disbursements of moneys.

All moneys derived from fees, fines and costs assessed by the judge and collected by the clerk shall be paid to the county, or, in the case of a juvenile court serving more than one (1) county, revenue shall be disbursed in accordance with the contract between the various county governments.

Acts 1982, ch. 934, § 9; T.C.A., § 37-269.

Attorney General Opinions. Juvenile court fees collected by county clerk, OAG 99-093 (4/19/99).

37-1-210. Clerks of general sessions courts.

In those counties in which the general sessions court is also the juvenile court, the clerk of the court exercising juvenile jurisdiction in such counties prior to May 19, 1982, shall serve as clerk of the general sessions court when it is exercising juvenile jurisdiction after May 19, 1982, unless otherwise provided by law. No later than July 1, 2006, in those counties in which the general sessions court is also the juvenile court, the clerk of the court of general sessions or the clerk and master shall also serve as the juvenile court clerk, unless otherwise provided by law. Such clerks shall maintain separate minutes, dockets and records for all matters pertaining to juvenile court proceedings as required by law. County legislative bodies may, in their discretion, provide additional compensation to general sessions court judges in such counties.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), the clerk who is serving as clerk of the court with juvenile jurisdiction in any county having a population of not less than forty-six thousand eight hundred (46,800) nor more than forty-six thousand nine hundred (46,900), according to the 2000 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census, on June 30, 2003, shall continue to serve as the clerk of the court with juvenile jurisdiction after July 1, 2003.

The second sentence of subsection (a) and the provisions of subsection (b) shall not apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than nor more than

5,500 5,600

11,369 11,450

27,700 27,800

37,200 37,300

Nothing in the second sentence of subsection (a) and the provisions of subsection (b) shall be construed as affecting special juvenile courts authorized by law or elected juvenile court clerks.

Acts 1982, ch. 934, § 10; T.C.A., § 37-270; Acts 2003, ch. 226, §§ 1, 3-8; 2007, ch. 275, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 1153, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. For an opinion of the attorney general opining that certain language concerning additional compensation for general sessions judges is unconstitutional, see OAG 87-150 (9/17/87).

The 2003 amendment of this section does not override conflicting private acts, and it does not apply at all in those counties exempted from its operation, OAG 03-122 (9/25/03).

Under T.C.A. §§37-1-203 and37-1-210(a), because the county general sessions court also exercises juvenile court jurisdiction, the law requires that the general sessions court clerk shall serve as the juvenile court clerk, OAG 07-097 (7/3/07).

37-1-211. Clerks of special juvenile courts.

The appropriate legislative body of a county having a special juvenile court may, by resolution, designate the duly elected clerk of another court of that county to serve as clerk of the special juvenile court. In any county in which the legislative body does not designate a duly elected clerk of another court to serve as clerk of the special juvenile court, the judge of such special juvenile court shall appoint a clerk or an administrator of the court, except in counties where a duly elected clerk is otherwise provided by law. Clerks of such special juvenile courts shall, under the supervision of the judge, keep all records of the court, and shall have all the duties, authorities, and obligations provided by law for clerks of other courts of record of this state, and shall give an appropriate surety bond for the faithful performance of their duties.

Subsection (a) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than nor more than

5,500 5,600

11,369 11,450

14,300 14,400

17,800 17,875

27,700 27,800

37,200 37,300

62,300 62,400

Nothing in this section shall be construed as affecting special juvenile courts authorized by law or elected juvenile court clerks.

Acts 1982, ch. 934, § 11; T.C.A., § 37-271; Acts 1988, ch. 629, § 1; 2003, ch. 226, §§ 2-6, 8.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of provision for designation of juvenile court clerk, OAG 99-027 (2/16/99).

Authority over the juvenile court system and its employees, OAG 07-004 (1/11/07).

37-1-212. Rules and regulations.

The judge is authorized and empowered to make and promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of the court, to fix the times and places at which all persons in the jurisdiction of the court shall have their causes set for hearing.

Acts 1982, ch. 934, § 12; T.C.A., § 37-272.

Attorney General Opinions. The judge of the juvenile court may promulgate rules and regulations providing for the court clerk to carry out the clerk's duties as part of the judge's authority to promulgate rules and regulations “for the administration of the court,” OAG 00-112 (6/20/00).

Authority over the juvenile court system and its employees, OAG 07-004 (1/11/07).

37-1-213. Deputies.

The sheriffs of the various counties shall furnish the necessary deputies and special deputies to attend and dispense with the business of such courts.

Acts 1982, ch. 934, § 13; T.C.A., § 37-273.

Attorney General Opinions. Appointment of court officer authorized to carry weapon in courtrooms; required training, qualifications, etc. OAG 10-77, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 83 (6/1/10).

POST certification of bailiffs and court officers. OAG 10-107, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 113 (10/28/10).

37-1-214. Compensation of judges pro tempore.

Any judge pro tempore elected under this part shall be paid the usual and customary rate of compensation.

Acts 1982, ch. 934, § 18; T.C.A., § 37-275.